Georgia, session 2025_26, HB641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 3 of Title 46, relating to electrical service, is amended in Code Section 46-3-11,
relating to application by electric supplier of discriminatory rates, charges, or service rules
or regulations and prohibited acts by electric suppliers generally, by adding a new subsection
to read as follows:
"(c)(1) A residential consumer of an electric supplier may provide such electric supplier
written notice that he or she suffers from a serious illness which would be aggravated by
the discontinuation of electric service to such consumer. Such notice shall be made in
writing or, if made orally, with written notice being provided to the electric supplier
H. B. 641
- 1 -

LC 55 0548
within ten days thereafter. Within ten days of providing such notice to an electric
supplier, the residential customer shall furnish the electric supplier a written statement
from a physician, county board of health, hospital, or other medical clinic that identifies
such illness, provides an estimated duration the consumer will suffer from such illness,
and certifies that such illness would be aggravated by the discontinuation of electric
service to such consumer.
(2) No electric supplier shall discontinue electric service to a residential consumer who
complies with the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection for such consumer's
nonpayment of a bill and, instead, such electric supplier shall hold such proposed
discontinuation of electric service in abeyance for the estimated duration of the serious
illness identified in the written statement provided to the electric supplier or a period of
one month, whichever is shorter. A residential consumer may renew such abeyance
period one additional time for the same illness by repeating the requirements of paragraph
(1) of this subsection."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 641
- 2 -